Hawaii statutes.
F. Nursing Scholars Program

[§304A-3301] Definitions. As used in
this subpart, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Approved course of study" means a
course of study that leads to enrollment in a graduate nursing program approved
by the state board of nursing or a course of study in a graduate nursing
program approved by the state board of nursing.

"Approved educational institution"
means a public post-secondary educational institution located in this State
that has been accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting agency that is
listed by the United States Secretary of Education.

"Program" means the nursing scholars
program.

"Student" means any individual
domiciled in this State who attends or is about to attend a post-secondary
educational institution located in this State leading to a master's or doctoral
degree in nursing and who intends to teach in a nursing program in Hawaii
designed to prepare students for licensure as registered nurses.

"Work requirement" means teaching at
a school of nursing located in Hawaii after receiving a master's degree or
doctoral degree in nursing. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next